Washington statutes.
RCW 18.220.130

Unprofessional conduct.

In addition to the unprofessional conduct described in RCW 18.235.130, the following conduct, acts, and conditions constitute unprofessional conduct:

(1) Violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter;

(2) Not meeting the qualifications for licensing set forth by this chapter; or

(3) Committing any other act, or failing to act, which act or failure are customarily regarded as being contrary to the accepted professional conduct or standard generally expected of those practicing geology.

[ 2007 c 256 s 6; 2002 c 86 s 263; 2000 c 253 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.